src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V
 +Caus:ig ADsplit ;
 +Mid:iĝ  ADsplit ;
          ADsplit ;
          
          
LEXICON ADsplit
 +Verb:  AD   ; ! empty entry--go to AD
 +Verb:  Vend ; ! empty entry--go to Vend

LEXICON AD
 +Cont:ad Vend ; ! aspect (an optional morpheme)
 
LEXICON Vend
 +Inf:i  # ; ! infinitive
 +Pres:as # ; ! present
 +Past:is # ; ! past
 +Fut:os # ; ! future
 +Cond:us # ; ! conditional
 +Subj:u  # ; ! subjunctive
